Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201177-2610
Stamps; redemption
by Tax Commissioner; errors; adjust.

Upon the
written request of the original purchaser thereof and upon the return of any
unused stamps, the Tax Commissioner shall redeem such stamps. The Tax Commissioner
shall prepare a voucher showing the amount of such returned unused stamps
and shall cause to be drawn a warrant upon the State Treasurer for such amount
in favor of the person returning such unused stamps. The refunds shall be
paid from the various funds named in section 77-2602 in the same proportions
as the proceeds of the tax are allocated. By the terms of sections 77-2601
to 77-2615, the Tax Commissioner and the State Treasurer are specifically
authorized to adjust all errors in payments for unused stamps.

Laws 1947, c. 267, § 10, p. 864;

Laws 1959, c. 353, § 7, p. 1246;

Laws 1965, c. 501, § 4, p. 1597;

Laws 1965, c. 459, § 20, p. 1462;

Laws 1969, c. 645, § 11, p. 2562;

Laws 1971, LB 87, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 31.

This act which includes sections 77-2602, 77-2610, 77-2616, and 85-1,100 is valid under the Constitutions of Nebraska and the United States. Sandberg v. State, 188 Neb. 335, 196 N.W.2d 501 (1972).